src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! Proper noun inflection
!! ----------------------
!! The UNDEFINED language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

! Table of content
! ================
! - The morphological tags
! - - Male first names
! - - Female first names
! - - Surnames
! - - Place names and other names

! TODO: tones

! The morphological tags
! ======================

! For each group, the maltag etc. lexicon functions as a default
! lexicon. The other lexica are there for specific subgroups of the names.

LEXICON propmasc
+N+Prop+Masc:	propcase ;

LEXICON propfem
+N+Prop+Fem:		propcase ;

LEXICON PROP_NOUN1_F/SgOnly
+N+Prop+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}		NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg ;

LEXICON PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly
+N+Prop+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}		NOUN1_M_PostBoundarySg ;

LEXICON PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Masc+Sg:´´%>{N}		NOUN1_M_PostBoundarySg ;

LEXICON PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_F/SgOnly
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Fem+Sg:´%>{N}		NOUN1_F_PostBoundarySg ;


LEXICON proptag
+N+Prop:			propcase ;

! usually final tone with proper nouns.
LEXICON propcase
+Sg+Nom: Clitics ;
+Sg+Abs: Clitics ;
+Sg+Gen: Clitics ;

LEXICON placetag 
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom: Clitics ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Abs: Clitics ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen: Clitics ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Voc:ow Clitics ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
