src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON biblical_misc
 Aaholiibaamah proptag "Aholibamah" ;
 Aasaaf proptag "Asaph" ;
 Aaxaas proptag "Ahaz" ;
 Abiihuu proptag "Abihu" ;
 Abiishuur proptag "Abishur" ;
 Adaamaah proptag "Adamah" ;
 Adoniiraam:Adoniiraa%{mm%} proptag "Adoniram" ;
 Afiya proptag "Apphia" ;
 Akshaaf proptag "Achshaph" ;
 Amasyaah proptag "Amaziah" ;
 Aniicaam:Aniicaa%{mm%} proptag "Aniam" ;
 Arbac proptag "Arba" ;
 Ashnaah proptag "Ashnah" ;
 Axiino'am:Axiino'a%{mm%} proptag "Ahinoam" ;
 Baabel proptag "Babel" ;
 Bariska proptag "Prisca" ;
 Bedaan proptag "Bedan" ;
 Beraakaah proptag "Berachah" ;
 Beytesda proptag "Bethesda" ;
 Bohan proptag "Bohan" ;
 Caashaan proptag "Ashan" ;
 Caksaah proptag "Achsah" ;
 Canaamiim:Canaamii%{mm%} proptag "Anamim" ;
 Casaryaah proptag "Azariah" ;
 Cataarood proptag "Ataroth" ;
 Ceefah proptag "Ephah" ;
 Cesraa proptag "Ezra" ;
 Cobadyaah proptag "Obadiah" ;
 Cummaah proptag "Ummah" ;
 Debooraah proptag "Deborah" ;
 Dishon proptag "Dishon" ;
 Eeloon proptag "Elon" ;
 Eliifas proptag "Eliphaz" ;
 Eliyaqiim:Eliyaqii%{mm%} proptag "Eliakim" ;
 Enoog proptag "Henoch" ;
 Faaraah proptag "Parah" ;
 Feelikos proptag "Felix" ;
 Fiinon proptag "Pinon" ;
 Fuutii'eel proptag "Putiel" ;
 Gasaam:Gasaa%{mm%} proptag "Gazzam" ;
 Gerisiim:Gerisii%{mm%} proptag "Gerizim" ;
 Giloh proptag "Giloh" ;
 Haagaar PROP_NOUN1_F/SgOnly "Agar, Hagar" ;
 Haasheem:Haashee%{mm%} proptag "Hashem" ;
 Hindiya proptag "India" ;
 Iiceser proptag "Jeezer" ;
 Itoobiya proptag "Cush" ;
 Karmii proptag "Carmi" ;
 Keriid proptag "Cherith" ;
 Kuush proptag "Cush" ;
 Lee'ah proptag "Leah" ;
 Maajuuj proptag "Magog" ;
 Malki proptag "Melchi" ;
 Masarood proptag "Mazzaroth" ;
 Medaan proptag "Medan" ;
 Mene proptag "Mene" ;
 Migdal proptag "Migdalgad" ;
 Miqlood proptag "Mikloth" ;
 Moreh proptag "Moreh" ;
 Nacam:Naca%{mm%} proptag "Naam" ;
 Neeri proptag "Neri" ;
 Nibxas proptag "Nibhaz" ;
 Ohad proptag "Ohad" ;
 Qaynaan proptag "Cainan" ;
 Qiishyoon proptag "Kishion" ;
 Raaxeel proptag "Rachel" ;
 Reekaab proptag "Rechab" ;
 Riblaah proptag "Riblah" ;
 Saabaad proptag "Zabad" ;
 Safanyaah proptag "Zephaniah" ;
 Samgar proptag "Sarsechim" ;
 Secoriim:Secorii%{mm%} proptag "Seorim" ;
 Selac proptag "sela" ;
 Serax proptag "Zerah" ;
 Shaaraar proptag "Sharar" ;
 Sharoon proptag "Saron" ;
 Sheeshbasar proptag "Sheshbazzar" ;
 Shemer proptag "Shemer" ;
 Shilleem:Shillee%{mm%} proptag "Shillem" ;
 Shooca proptag "Shoa" ;
 Sidqiyaah proptag "Zedekiah" ;
 Siixon proptag "Sihon" ;
 Sohar proptag "Zohar" ;
 Suu'ax proptag "Suah" ;
 Talinayay proptag "Obil" ;
 Telax proptag "Telah" ;
 Terax PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Terah" ;
 Timneh proptag "Timnah" ;
 Tummiim:Tummii%{mm%} proptag "Thummim" ;
 Xaaboor proptag "Habor" ;
 Xaggiyaah proptag "Haggiah" ;
 Xaraadaah proptag "Haradah" ;
 Xasufaa proptag "Hashupha" ;
 Xeles proptag "Helez" ;
 Xolon proptag "Holon" ;
 Xuur proptag "Hur" ;
 Yaaguur proptag "Jagur" ;
 Yacaqobaah proptag "Jaakobah" ;
 Yasoon proptag "Jason" ;
 Yediidaah proptag "Jedidah" ;
 Yehooxaanaan proptag "Jehohanan" ;
 Yeriimood proptag "Jerimoth" ;
 Yexdeyaah proptag "Jehdeiah" ;
 Yishiyaah proptag "Jesiah" ;
 Yooceelaah proptag "Joelah" ;
 Yooyaariib proptag "Joiarib" ;
 Beytlaxam proptag "?" ;
 Gibecaad proptag "?" ;
 Netofaah proptag "?" ;
 Yotbaah proptag "?" ;
LEXICON Prop_N1M
 Maxamuud PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
 Sheekh PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
 Xasan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
 Carl PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Carl" ;
 Aabeel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Abel" ;
 Aabraam:Aabraa%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Abram" ;
 Aabyaataar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Abiathar" ;
 Aacii PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ai" ;
 Aadaam:Aada%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ;
 Aadaam:Aadaa%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Adam" ;
 Aakiish PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Achish" ;
 Abiinocam:Abiinoca%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Abinoam" ;
 Abneer PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Abner" ;
 Absaaloom:Absaaloo%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Absalom" ;
 Ananiyas PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ;
 Ashuur PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ashur, Assyria" ; ! PLC also
 Axaab PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ahab" ;
 Axiimeleg PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ahimelech" ;
 Axiituub PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ahitub" ;
 Ayuub PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Job" ;
 Baaraaq PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Barak" ;
 Baaruug PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Baruch" ;
 Bacal PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Baal" ;
 Bawlos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Paul" ;
 Beelshaasar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Belshazzar" ;
 Beelteshaasar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Belteshazzar" ;
 Benyaamiin PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Benjamin" ;
 Bontos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Pontus" ;
 Butros PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Peter" ;
 Caamoos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ;
 Cali PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ; 
 Camaaleq PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Amalekites" ;
 Casaaheel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Asahel" ;
 Cayr PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "?" ;
 Ceelaam:Ceelaa%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Elam" ;
 Ciise PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Jesus" ;
 Cimmaanuu'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Immanuel" ;
 Cusiyaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Uzziah" ;
 Daa'uud PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "David" ;
 Daan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Dan" ;
 Daanyeel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Daniel" ;
 Daariyus PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
 Daauud PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "David" ;
 Edom:Edo%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Edom" ; ! TODO: block n/m
 Edom:Edoo%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Edom" ; ! TODO: block n/m
 Eebe PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Lord" ;
 Efrayim:Efrayi%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ephraim" ;
 Elecaaleeh PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Elealeh" ;
 Eliiyaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Eliah, Elijah" ;
 Falastiin PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Palestina" ;
 Fashxuur PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Pashur" ;
 Filibos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Philip" ;
 Fircoon PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Pharaoh" ;
 Gaad PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Gad" ;
 Gacal PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Gaal" ; ! TODO: this has a plural also
 Geexasii PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Gehazi" ;
 Gidcoon PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Gideon" ;
 Haamaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Haman" ; ! Haamaanoow and Haamaanow?
 Haaruun PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Aaron" ;
 Ibraahim:Ibraahi%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Ibrahim" ;
 Ilaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "god" ;
 Isaakaar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Issachar, Zuar" ;
 Jibriil PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Gabriel" ;
 Korintos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Corinth" ;
 Laawi PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Levi" ;
 Lemuu'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Lemuel" ;
 Luud:Luud PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Lot" ;
 Luud:Luudh PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Lud" ;
 Masiix PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Christ" ; ! TODO: Masiixiisa; prop, but has Px.
 Mefiiboshed PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Mephibosheth" ;
 Miikayhuu PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Micaiah" ;
 Moo'aab PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Moab" ;
 Muuse PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Moses" ;
 Naaxaash PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Nahash" ;
 Naftaali PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Naphtali, Vophsi?" ;
 Nebukadnesar:Nebukadnesar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Nebuchadnezzar" ;
 Nebukadnesar:Nebukadresar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Nebuchadnezzar" ;
 Nuux PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Noah" ;
 Rabbi PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Lord" ; ! TODO: +Bib tag
 Rexabcaam:Rexabcaa%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Rehoboam" ;
 Saa'uul PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Saul" ;
 Saamuu'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Samuel" ;
 Salaatii'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Salathiel" ;
 Salaatii'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Shealtiel" ;
 Samsoon PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Samson" ;
 Samuu'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Samuel" ;
 Samuu'eel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Shemuel" ;
 Sayid PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Seir" ; ! TODO: Sayidkayagiiyow
 Serubaabel PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Zerubbabel, Zorobabel" ;
 Shar PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Zebudah?" ; ! Sharrowgow? D2?
 Shayddaan:Shaydaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Satan" ;
 Shayddaan:Shayddaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Satan" ;
 Shekem:Sheke%{mm%} PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Shechem" ;
 Sifoor PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Zippor" ;
 Siyoon PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Sion, Zion" ;
 Sulaymaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Suleman" ;
 Teemaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Teman" ;
 Turos PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Tyre" ;
 Uuriyaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Urijah" ;
 Xananyaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Hananiah" ;
 Yaawaan PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Javan" ;
 Yahuudah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Judah" ;
 Yeremyaah PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Jeremiah" ;
 Yoo'aash PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Joash" ;
 Yoonis PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "jonah" ;
 Yuudas PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Judas" ;
 Yaafed PROP_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Japheth" ;
